Tennessee, session 114, SB0977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-1-119(a), is amended by deleting
the language "within sixty (60) days" and substituting the language "within forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0977
000942
- 1 -